Hawaii statutes.
§392-76 Representation. In any
proceeding for judicial review pursuant to section 392-75, the director may be
represented by the attorney general or by any qualified attorney who is
employed by the department for that purpose in conformity with section 28-8.3.
[L 1969, c 148, pt of §1; am L Sp 1993, c 8, §53; am L 2015, c 35, §38]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next